District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1127

Conflict.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-185, § 8, 35 DCR 7906
April 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1002, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1127.
1981 Ed., § 29-1207.